Georgia statutes. 
History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-253, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

36-82-254. Required information in annual financial statements.

Statute text

The local governmental entity that has entered into a qualified interest rate management agreement shall include in its annual financial statements information with respect to each qualified interest rate management agreement it has authorized or entered into, including any information required pursuant to any statement issued by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-254, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

36-82-255. Applicability of Georgia law; jurisdiction.

Statute text

When entering into any qualified interest rate management agreement authorized under this article, the agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of Georgia, and jurisdiction over the local governmental entity in any matter concerning a qualified interest rate management agreement shall lie exclusively in the courts of the State of Georgia or in the applicable federal court having jurisdiction and located within the State of Georgia.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-255, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

36-82-256. Applicability to prior contracts.

Statute text

Any contract which has been duly authorized and executed by a local governmental entity before May 2, 2005, shall not be rendered invalid or improper by the provisions of this article; provided, however, that this article shall apply to any renewal of such a contract after May 2, 2005, unless the contract permitted the renewal and set the terms of the renewal contract before January 1, 2005, in which case this article shall not apply to any such renewals.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-256, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, "May 2, 2005," was substituted for "the effective date of this article" and "May 2, 2005," was substituted for "its effective date" in this Code section.

——————————

CHAPTER 83

LOCAL GOVERNMENT INVESTMENT POOL

Sec.

36-83-1. Short title.

36-83-2. Legislative findings; purpose of chapter.

36-83-3. Definitions.

36-83-4. Authorized investments; delegation of investment authority to financial officer; objective of investment.

36-83-5. Pledge of collateral from depository institutions.

36-83-6. Interfund pooling for investment purposes.

36-83-7. State technical assistance.

36-83-8. Local government investment pool.

36-83-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Investment Pool Act."

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 1.)

36-83-2. Legislative findings; purpose of chapter.

Statute text

(a) The General Assembly finds that the public interest is served by maximum and prudent investment of idle public funds so that the need for taxes and other public revenues is decreased commensurately with the earnings on such investments.

(b) The purpose of this chapter is to secure the maximum public benefit from the deposit and investment of public funds and, in furtherance of such purpose, to:

(1) Authorize the State Depository Board to establish and maintain a continuing state-wide policy for the deposit and investment of public funds under its control;

(2) Establish a state administered pool for the investment of local government funds;

(3) Authorize the investment of local public funds through the local government investment pool created by this chapter; and

(4) Permit, upon approval by the State Depository Board, any body created for a public purpose to invest funds through the local government investment pool.

(c) The General Assembly finds that the objectives of this chapter will best be obtained through improved money management, emphasizing the primary requirements of safety and liquidity and recognizing the different investment objectives of operating and permanent funds and the effect of the investment of public funds within the state or its localities upon respective state and local social and economic conditions.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 205, § 1.)

36-83-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Depository institution" means any commercial bank or trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or building and loan association existing under the laws of this state or of the United States and domiciled in this state.

(2) "Local government" means any municipality, county, school district, special district, or other political subdivision of this state, as well as any department, agency, or board of that political subdivision, including but not limited to a public library, which has been authorized to make separate deposits to its own account under this chapter by the governing authority of the political subdivision of which it is a department, agency, or board.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 455, § 1.)

36-83-4. Authorized investments; delegation of investment authority to financial officer; objective of investment.

Statute text

(a) (1) Subject to the procedures set forth in this chapter, the governing authority of any local government may invest and reinvest any money subject to its control and jurisdiction in:

(A) Obligations of this state or of other states;

(B) Obligations issued by the United States government;

(C) Obligations fully insured or guaranteed by the United States government or a United States government agency;

(D) Obligations of any corporation of the United States government;

(E) Prime bankers' acceptances;

(F) The local government investment pool established by Code Section 36-83-8;

(G) Repurchase agreements; and

(H) Obligations of other political subdivisions of this state.

(2) Subject to the procedures set forth in this chapter, any other body created for a public purpose may, upon obtaining prior approval of the State Depository Board, invest and reinvest any money subject to its control and jurisdiction in the local government investment pool established by Code Section 36-83-8.

(b) The governing authority of any local government, by resolution or ordinance, may delegate the investment authority provided under subsection (a) of this Code section to the treasurer or other financial officer charged with custody of the funds of the local government.

(c) In selecting among avenues of investment or among institutional bids for deposits, the highest rate of return shall be the objective, given equivalent conditions of safety and liquidity.

(d) This Code section shall in no way impair the power of a unit of local government to hold funds in deposit accounts with eligible depository institutions.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 205, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Hospital authorities not eligible. - Hospital authorities created pursuant to the "Hospital Authorities Law" are not eligible to participate in the local government investment pool created by O.C.G.A. § 36-83-8. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-78.

36-83-5. Pledge of collateral from depository institutions.

Statute text

Local governments shall require from a depository institution a pledge of collateral as provided in Chapter 8 of Title 45.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 5.)

36-83-6. Interfund pooling for investment purposes.

Statute text

(a) Local governments may effect and are encouraged to effect temporary transfers among separate funds, for the purpose of pooling amounts available for investment.

(b) This pooling may be accomplished through interfund advances and other appropriate means consistent with recognized principles of governmental accounting, if:

(1) Moneys are available for the investment period required;

(2) The investment fund can repay the advance by the time needed;

(3) The transactions are fully and promptly recorded;

(4) The interest earned is credited to the loaning or advancing fund; and

(5) The transaction does not violate subsection (d) of Code Section 36-83-8 with respect to prior agreements, laws, or covenants which may restrict pooling.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 6.)

36-83-7. State technical assistance.

Statute text

The State Depository Board, through the state treasurer, may assist local governments in developing effective cash management policies and in investing funds that are temporarily in excess of operating needs by:

(1) Explaining investment opportunities provided by the local government investment pool to local governments through publications and other appropriate means;

(2) Informing local governments of the state's practice and experience in investing short-term funds; and

(3) In consultation with the Department of Community Affairs, providing technical assistance in the investment of idle funds to municipalities and counties that request such assistance.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

36-83-8. Local government investment pool.

Statute text

(a) A local government investment pool is created, consisting of the aggregate of all funds from local governments and all funds from other bodies created for a public purpose which the State Depository Board has agreed to accept that are placed in the custody of the state for investment and reinvestment as provided in this chapter.

(b) (1) The investment policies for the local government investment pool shall be established by the State Depository Board.

(2) The state treasurer shall administer the local government investment pool on behalf of the participating local governments.

(3) The state treasurer shall develop such procedures consistent with the policies established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as he deems necessary for the efficient administration of the pool, including, but not limited to:

(A) Specification of minimum amounts which may be deposited in the pool and minimum periods of time for which deposits shall be retained in the pool;

(B) Payment of amounts equivalent to administrative expenses from the earnings of the pool;

(C) Distribution of the earnings in excess of such expenses or allocation of losses to the several participants, in a manner which equitably reflects the differing amount of their respective investments and the differing periods of time for which such amounts were in the custody of the pool; and

(D) Procedures for the deposit and withdrawal of funds.

(c) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the local government investment pool with the degree of judgment and care, under circumstances then prevailing, which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not for speculation, but for investment, considering first the probable safety of their capital and then the probable income to be derived. Specifically, the types of authorized investments for pool assets shall be limited to those set forth in Code Section 50-5A-7 and Chapter 17 of Title 50.

(d) (1) The governing authority of any local government having funds which are available for investment and which are not required by law or by any covenant or agreement with bondholders or others to be segregated and invested in a different manner may direct its financial officer to remit such funds to the state treasurer for investment as part of the local government investment pool.

(2) Upon determination by the local governing authority that it is in the best interest of the local government to deposit funds in the investment pool, it shall adopt and file with the state treasurer a certified copy of a resolution or ordinance authorizing investment of its funds in the investment pool. The resolution or ordinance shall name the local government official or officials responsible for the deposit and withdrawal of such funds.

(3) The resolution or ordinance filed with the state treasurer shall be accompanied by a statement as to the approximate cash flow requirements of the local government for the invested funds. Subsequent deposits into the investment pool shall be accompanied by a statement as to the intended duration of the investment or the anticipated date of withdrawal of the funds from the pool.

(e) A separate account designated by name or number for each participant in the fund shall be kept to record individual transactions and totals of all investments belonging to each participant. A monthly report showing the changes in investments made during the preceding month shall be furnished to each participant having a beneficial interest in the investment pool. Details of any investment transaction shall be furnished to any participant upon request.

(f) The principal and credited income of each account maintained for a participant in the investment pool shall be subject to payment from the pool at any time upon request, subject to the procedures developed in accordance with paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section. Accumulated income shall be credited to each participant account at least monthly.

(g) Except as provided in this Code section, all instruments of title of all investments of the investment pool shall remain in the custody of the state treasurer. The state treasurer may deposit with one or more fiscal agents or banks those instruments of title which he considers advisable, to be held in safekeeping by the agents or banks for collection of the principal and interest or other income or of the proceeds of sale. The state treasurer shall collect the principal and interest or other income from investments of the investment pool the instruments of title to which are in his custody, when due and payable.

(h) In the event of default in the payment of the principal or interest or other income of any investment of the investment pool, the state treasurer may:

(1) Institute the proper proceedings to collect the matured principal or interest or other income;

(2) Accept for exchange purposes refunding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, at interest rates to be agreed upon by the state treasurer and the obligor;

(3) Make compromises, adjustments, or disposition of the matured principal or interest or other income, as the state treasurer considers advisable for the purpose of protecting the moneys invested; or

(4) Make compromises or adjustments as to future payments of principal or interest or other income, as the state treasurer considers advisable for the purpose of protecting the moneys invested.

(i) No payment may be issued upon any account in an amount greater than the sum total of the particular account to which it applies. If such payment is issued, the state treasurer shall be personally liable under his official bond for the entire overdraft resulting from the payment if made.

(j) Subject to the objectives and requirements of this Code section, the state treasurer shall formulate procedures for the investment and reinvestment of funds in the investment pool and the acquisition, retention, management, and disposition of investments of the investment pool.

(k) Funds in the local government investment pool may be consolidated with state funds under the control of the state treasurer for investment purposes, if accurate and detailed accounting records are maintained for the funds of each participating local government and a proportionate amount of interest earned is credited to the local government investment pool and the accounts therein. The state treasurer may also place the funds in a separate trust fund to be administered by the state treasurer pursuant to policies established by the State Depository Board.

(l) Payments of amounts for administrative expenses shall be deemed contractually obligated funds held in trust for the benefit of the local government investment pool and shall not lapse.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1715, § 8; Ga. L. 1986, p. 205, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1474, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 3, 4/SB 296; Ga. L. 2015, p. 826, § 1/HB 95.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Hospital authorities not eligible. - Hospital authorities created pursuant to the "Hospital Authorities Law" are not eligible to participate in the local government investment pool created by O.C.G.A. § 36-83-8. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-78.

——————————

CHAPTER 84

PURCHASING PREFERENCES

Sec.

36-84-1. Preferences for products manufactured in Georgia; reasonableness.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 5, effective April 20, 2000, repealed and reserved this chapter. The former chapter, relating to competition for public work bids, consisted of Code Sections 36-84-1 and 36-84-2 and was based on Ga. L. 1896, p. 73, §§ 1-5; Civil Code 1910, §§ 390-392; Penal Code 1910, § 741; Code 1933, §§ 23-1710 - 23-1712, 23-9905.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 204, § 6/SB 44, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall not be applied to impair an obligation of any contract entered into prior to the date this Act becomes effective." The effective date of this Act is July 1, 2009.

36-84-1. Preferences for products manufactured in Georgia; reasonableness.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "local government" means a county, municipality, or consolidated government.

(b) Local governments, when contracting for or purchasing supplies, materials, equipment, or agricultural products, excluding beverages for immediate consumption, shall give preference as far as may be reasonable and practicable to such supplies, materials, equipment, and agricultural products as may be manufactured or produced in this state. Such preference shall not sacrifice quality.

(c) In determining whether such a preference is reasonable in any case where the value of a contract for or purchase of such supplies, materials, equipment, or agricultural products exceeds $100,000.00, the local government shall consider, among other factors, information submitted by the bidder which may include the bidder's estimate of the multiplier effect on gross state domestic product and the effect on public revenues of the state and the effect on public revenues of political subdivisions resulting from acceptance of a bid or offer to sell Georgia manufactured or produced goods as opposed to out-of-state manufactured or produced goods. Any such estimates shall be in writing. No local government shall divide a contract or purchase which exceeds $100,000.00 for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this subsection.

(d) Nothing in this Code section shall negate the requirements of Code Section 50-5-73.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-84-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 204, § 2/SB 44.)

——————————

CHAPTER 85

INTERLOCAL RISK MANAGEMENT AGENCIES

Sec.

36-85-1. Definitions.

36-85-2. Formation; functions; counties and municipalities as separate classes; agreements creating agencies; files of administrator are sole property of agency.

36-85-3. Board of trustees.

36-85-4. Agency not an insurer.

36-85-5. Certificate of authority; application.

36-85-6. Approval of certificate; renewal.

36-85-7. Funds to be maintained.

36-85-8. Investment of assets.

36-85-9. Local government liability for funds.

36-85-10. Contracts between agency and administrator.

36-85-11. Fidelity bond and errors and omissions insurance; administrators to maintain office in state.

36-85-12. Revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew certificate of authority; hearing; voluntary dissolution of fund.

36-85-13. Exemption from state and local taxes and fees.

36-85-14. Periodic examinations.

36-85-15. Fund deficiencies; assessments upon members; liquidation of fund.

36-85-16. Rules and regulations.

36-85-17. Hearings.

36-85-18. Excess loss funding program required.

36-85-19. Audits of funds.

36-85-20. Exercise of authority not provision of liability insurance; sovereign immunity.

Annotations

Cross references. - Joint self-insurance programs for boards of education and school systems, § 20-2-2001 et seq.

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Rules of Commissioner of Insurance, Chapter 120-2.

Code Commission notes. - Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1 and Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1 both enacted a Chapter 85 of Title 36. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1, was redesignated as Chapter 67A of Title 36 pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5.

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

36-85-1. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Administrator" means any person who administers a group self-insurance fund other than the interlocal risk management agency.

(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Insurance.

(3) "County" means any county of the State of Georgia. Such term shall include any public authority, commission, board, or similar agency which is created by local or general Act of the General Assembly and which carries out its functions on a county-wide basis or wholly within the unincorporated area of a county. The term shall also include any such body which is created or activated by a resolution or ordinance of the governing body of the county individually or jointly with other political subdivisions of the state.

(4) "General liability" means liability for bodily injury, death, or damage to property owned by others to which a municipality or county may be subject either directly or by reason of liability arising out of an act, error, or omission of its employee, agent, or officer in the course and scope of employment.

(5) "Governing authority" means the body which exercises the legislative functions of the municipality or county.

(6) "Group self-insurance fund" or "fund" means a pool of public moneys established by an interlocal risk management agency from contributions of its members in order to pool the risks of accident, disability, supplemental medical, general liability, motor vehicle liability, property damage, or any combination of such risks.

(7) "Interlocal risk management agency" or "agency" means an association formed by municipalities or counties by the execution of an intergovernmental contract for the development and administration of an interlocal risk management program and one or more group self-insurance funds.

(8) "Interlocal risk management program" means a plan and activities carried out under such plan by an interlocal risk management agency to reduce risk of loss on account of accident, disability, supplemental medical, general liability, motor vehicle liability, or property damage, including safety engineering and other loss prevention and control techniques, and to administer one or more group self-insurance funds, including the processing and defense of claims brought against members of the agency.

(9) "Motor vehicle liability" means liability to which a municipality or county may be subject either directly or by reason of liability arising out of the use of a motor vehicle by its employee, agent, or officer in the course and scope of employment. Said term shall also include loss on account of property damage to motor vehicles.

(10) "Municipality" means a municipal corporation of the State of Georgia. Such term shall include any public authority, commission, board, or similar agency which is created by general or local Act of the General Assembly and which carries out its functions wholly or partly within the boundaries of the municipality. The term shall also include such bodies which are created or activated by an ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the municipality individually or jointly with other political subdivisions of the state. The term shall also include any independent school system of this state which elects to participate in the interlocal risk management agency composed of municipalities; provided, however, such independent school system must have a full-time equivalent student count of at least 2,800 in order to elect to become a member of the interlocal risk management agency composed of municipalities.

(11) "Property damage" means loss to which a municipality or county may be subject by reason of physical damage or destruction to real or personal property owned or leased by such municipality or county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1454, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 717, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 336, § 2/HB 146; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 36/SB 52.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, inserted "accident, disability, supplemental medical," in the middle of paragraphs (6) and (8).

The 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted "composed of municipalities" for "comprised of municipalities" in two places in the last sentence of paragraph (10).

Law reviews. - For annual survey of law of torts, see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 375 (1992). For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Respondeat superior principles used to analyze coverage question. - Respondeat superior principles were used to analyze a coverage question under a Georgia Interlocal Risk Management Agency agreement as the statutory language and coverage language was similar to that used by Georgia courts in applying the theory of respondeat superior. Ga. Interlocal Risk Mgmt. Agency v. Godfrey, 273 Ga. App. 77, 614 S.E.2d 201 (2005).

Police trainee not "member." - Police trainee was not covered by a Georgia Interlocal Risk Management Agency agreement when the trainee obtained a police car to drive to work the next day, used the car to stop a victim, and robbed and murdered the victim for the purely personal reason of obtaining money to pay a drug dealer. Ga. Interlocal Risk Mgmt. Agency v. Godfrey, 273 Ga. App. 77, 614 S.E.2d 201 (2005).

Cited in CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 196 F. Supp. 2d 1288 (S.D. Ga. 2002).

36-85-2. Formation; functions; counties and municipalities as separate classes; agreements creating agencies; files of administrator are sole property of agency.

Statute text

(a) A group of municipalities or a group of counties may execute an intergovernmental contract among themselves to form and become members of an interlocal risk management agency. After an interlocal risk management agency has been formed, any municipality or county may, subject to the bylaws and requirements of such agency, become a member and, through participation in the agency, may:

(1) Pool its general liability risks in whole or in part with those of other municipalities or counties;

(2) Pool its motor vehicle liability risks in whole or in part with those of other municipalities or counties;

(3) Pool its property damage risks in whole or in part with those of other municipalities or counties; or

(4) Jointly purchase accident, disability, supplemental medical, general liability, motor vehicle liability, or property damage insurance with other municipalities or counties participating in and belonging to the interlocal risk management agency, the participating municipalities or counties to be coinsured under a master policy or policies with the total premium apportioned among such participants.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, municipalities and counties shall be deemed to constitute separate classes, and no member of any one such class shall join with a member of another class for the purpose of creating an interlocal risk management agency. There shall be only one interlocal risk management agency established for each class; provided, however, if the Commissioner determines that there are special or unique circumstances or needs of a group of counties or municipalities which justify the establishment of an additional interlocal risk management agency or agencies, he may authorize the establishment of such additional agency or agencies. Each agency may establish such group self-insurance funds as may be authorized by the Commissioner of Insurance.

(c) All arrangements and agreements made under the authority of this chapter shall be in writing. A municipality or county may become a member of an interlocal risk management agency by the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by the governing authority of the municipality or county. The interlocal risk management agency shall operate under such name and style as shall be provided in the intergovernmental contract creating such agency and shall have the power to bring and defend actions in all courts.

(d) All books, records, and files maintained by any administrator of any fund established by the agency, including but not limited to audit data and all active and inactive claim files, shall at all times be the sole property of the agency and shall be surrendered immediately to the agency upon demand.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1454, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 336, § 3/HB 146.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, inserted "accident, disability, supplemental medical," near the beginning of paragraph (a)(4).

36-85-3. Board of trustees.

Statute text

Each intergovernmental contract establishing an intergovernmental risk management agency shall provide for a board of trustees which shall govern the agency. Such board shall be authorized to administer the agency in accordance with the provisions of the intergovernmental contract establishing the agency and shall be authorized to adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations as may be necessary or desirable in administering such agency.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-4. Agency not an insurer.

Statute text

An interlocal risk management agency created pursuant to this chapter is not an insurance company or an insurer under Title 33, and the development and administration by such agency of one or more group self-insurance funds shall not constitute doing business as an insurer.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Coverage agreement with Georgia Interlocal Risk Management Agency excluded uninsured and underinsured motorist protection. - Court of appeals correctly determined that no statute required that a city's agreement with the Georgia Interlocal Risk Management Agency (GIRMA) had to meet the uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage requirements that an insurance policy issued by an insurer had to meet pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 33-7-11 because the General Assembly explicitly declared that GIRMA was not an insurer; the city's agreement with GIRMA was limited to its express terms and did not include underinsured motorist protection. Godfrey v. Ga. Interlocal Risk Mgmt. Agency, 290 Ga. 211, 719 S.E.2d 412 (2011).

Cited in Adams v. Perdue, 199 Ga. App. 476, 405 S.E.2d 305 (1991).

36-85-5. Certificate of authority; application.

Statute text

(a) No interlocal risk management agency shall establish a group self-insurance fund or funds until such agency has been issued a certificate of authority by the Commissioner of Insurance as provided in this Code section and under such rules and regulations as the Commissioner may promulgate to assure compliance with this chapter.

(b) The Commissioner shall not be authorized to issue any certificate of authority pursuant to this Code section prior to April 30, 1987. Any application for a certificate of authority pursuant to this Code section which is filed prior to March 1, 1987, shall be updated by the applicant in order to comply with any statute, rule, or regulation which may be promulgated or enacted prior to the issuance of the certificate of authority.

(c) When applying for a certificate of authority, an interlocal risk management agency shall file with the Commissioner an application setting forth:

(1) The name of the agency;

(2) The location of the agency's principal office;

(3) The names and addresses of the members of the agency;

(4) The names and addresses of the members of each fund;

(5) The name and address of a Georgia resident designated and appointed as each fund's proposed registered agent for service of process in this state;

(6) The names and addresses of the members of the board of trustees of the agency;

(7) A copy of the bylaws of the agency;

(8) A copy of the intergovernmental contract establishing the agency;

(9) A copy of the agreement or agreements establishing each fund;

(10) A copy of any agreements between the agency, any fund of the agency, and any administrator of a fund;

(11) A statement of the financial condition of the agency and each fund of the agency listing all of their assets and liabilities as of the end of the last preceding month prior to the date of the application on such a form as may be prescribed by the Commissioner;

(12) A copy of each contract, endorsement, and application form proposed to be issued or used in connection with each fund. Such contracts, endorsements, applications, or revisions thereto shall be filed with and approved by the Commissioner prior to their use; and

(13) A copy of the rates, rating systems, and rules proposed to be used in connection with each fund. Such rates, rating systems, rules, and any revisions thereto shall be filed with and approved by the Commissioner prior to their use.

(d) A fund authorized by this chapter may be established by an agency only if the agency has enrolled members which:

(1) For each motor vehicle liability and general liability fund shall generate an annual gross premium of not less than $300,000.00;

(2) For each property damage fund shall generate an annual gross premium of not less than $200,000.00;

(3) For each fund which includes motor vehicle liability or general liability with property damage shall generate an annual gross premium of not less than $500,000.00;

(4) For each fund which includes motor vehicle liability, general liability, and property damage shall generate an annual gross premium of not less than $800,000.00; or

(5) For each fund which includes accident, disability, or supplemental medical coverage shall generate an annual gross premium of not less than $500,000.00.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1454, § 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 336, § 4/HB 146.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, deleted "or" at the end of paragraph (d)(3), substituted "; or" for the period at the end of paragraph (d)(4), and added paragraph (d)(5).

36-85-6. Approval of certificate; renewal.

Statute text

(a) The Commissioner shall examine the application made under Code Section 36-85-5 to determine whether the agency and any established fund will be able to comply with this chapter and applicable rules and regulations. If the Commissioner finds that the agency and any established fund are capable of complying with such requirements, he shall issue a certificate of authority to the agency.

(b) If the Commissioner refuses to issue a certificate of authority, he shall issue an order setting forth the reasons for refusal and forward it to the agency. A copy of the order shall be sent to each member of the fund.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-85-5, the Commissioner shall approve or disapprove the application for a certificate of authority within 60 days of receipt by him of the application and all of the supporting information requested.

(d) The Commissioner may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any agency, in accordance with Code Section 36-85-12, for failure of the agency to comply with any provision of this chapter or with any of the rules, regulations, or orders of the Commissioner issued pursuant thereto.

(e) The certificate shall be renewed annually in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-7. Funds to be maintained.

Statute text

Each fund formed pursuant to this chapter shall possess and thereafter maintain minimum surplus in an amount such as the Commissioner may reasonably establish or subsequently require for the protection of the members. The Commissioner may authorize a fund to maintain a deposit with the Commissioner consisting of securities eligible for deposit by domestic insurance companies in accordance with Chapter 12 of Title 33 or, for a period not to exceed 60 months, to post a surety bond in lieu of maintaining the minimum surplus required by this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-8. Investment of assets.

Statute text

The investable assets of a fund may be invested in securities or other investments permitted by the laws of this state for the investment of assets constituting the legal reserves of property and casualty insurance companies or in such other securities or investments as the Commissioner may permit such insurers to invest their funds under Title 33. Such investments shall be subject to the same terms, conditions, and limitations which apply to property and casualty insurance companies under Title 33.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-9. Local government liability for funds.

Statute text

Each county or municipality shall be jointly and severally liable for all legal obligations of a fund which arise out of an event which occurred while such county or municipality was a member of such fund; provided, however, that a fund shall not assume a risk greater than an amount to be determined by the Commissioner; and provided, further, that this legal obligation may be enforced by an assessment against such member as provided in the bylaws of the agency.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-10. Contracts between agency and administrator.

Statute text

(a) If an agency contracts with an administrator, the agency and the administrator must enter into a written agreement which shall be subject to review and approval by the Commissioner in accordance with this Code section and which shall contain at least the following:

(1) A contractual provision obligating the administrator to obtain and maintain such bonds, deposits, or insurance coverage as may be required to be maintained by this chapter; and

(2) A requirement that errors and omissions coverage or other appropriate liability insurance in an amount which is not less than that specified by the rules and regulations of the Commissioner be maintained at all times by the administrator.

(b) The terms of any such agreement shall be reasonable and equitable, and the agreement and any amendments thereto shall be filed with the Commissioner at least 30 days prior to their use. Any such agreement and any and all amendments thereto which have not been specifically disapproved by the Commissioner within 30 days after the filing thereof shall be deemed to be approved.

(c) A copy of the agreement and any and all amendments thereto shall be furnished to each agency or fund member upon request.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-85-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1496, § 1.)

36-85-11. Fidelity bond and errors and omissions insurance; administrators to maintain office in state.

Statute text

(a) The Commissioner shall require each administrator to have and maintain a fidelity bond in an amount which the Commissioner deems appropriate but which is not less than $100,000.00.
